South Dakota, session 2026, SB34.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 9-13:
For purposes of this chapter, "in conjunction with" is a temporal phrase that refers
to the timing of an election.
For purposes of this chapter, "combined with" refers to the sharing of governmental
responsibilities for an election.
Section 2. That § 9-13-4.1 be AMENDED:
9-13-4.1. No person An individual may not vote at any a municipal election unless
the person individual is registered to vote as a voter of the municipality, pursuant to
chapter 12-4, and resides in is a resident of the municipality at the time of the election.
For the purposes of this section, a person resides in an individual is a resident of
the municipality if the person actually lives individual:
(1) Lives in the municipality for at least thirty days each year, is;
(2) Is a full-time postsecondary education student who resided in was a resident of the
municipality immediately prior to leaving for the postsecondary education, or is; or
(3) Is on active duty as a member of the armed forces whose and the individual's home
of record is within the municipality. A voter's qualification as a resident may be
challenged in the manner provided in § 12-18-10.
No election may be contested on the grounds that any a nonresident was allowed
to vote if the nonresident was not challenged in the manner provided in § 12-18-10.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 9-13:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.430.35 2 34
If the governing body of the municipality and the board of county commissioners
of a county in which the municipality is located have agreed to combine the municipal
election with a primary or general election, pursuant to § 9-13-37, and have agreed to
use the same ballot for the offices, ballot questions, and other contests of each jurisdiction,
an individual's right to vote in the municipal election may be challenged only on the
grounds provided in § 12-18-10.
An individual's right to vote in the election may also be challenged as to whether
the individual is a resident of the municipality, if the municipal election is:
(1) Combined with a primary or general election, but is conducted using separate
ballots for the offices, ballot questions, and other contests of each jurisdiction;
(2) Combined with a regular school district election, regardless of whether the election
is conducted using the same ballots for the offices, ballot questions, and other
contests of each jurisdiction; or
(3) Not combined with any other election.
Any challenge to an individual's qualifications as a voter must be conducted before
the precinct election board in the manner provided in § 12-18-10.
Section 4. That § 9-13-6 be AMENDED:
9-13-6. The finance officer of the municipality shall have a notice published in the
official newspaper of the municipality setting forth the vacancies that will are to occur by
termination of the terms of office of elective officers. The notice must also state the time
and place where nominating petitions may be filed for the offices. The notice must be
published once each week for two consecutive weeks between no earlier than the fifteenth
day and nor later than the thirtieth day of the month six months before the election:
(1) January, for an election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June; or
(2) June, for an election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
Section 5. That § 9-13-13 be AMENDED:
9-13-13. A notice of each municipal election shall must be published once each
week for two successive weeks, the first publication may not be less than ten days prior
to the election. The last notice must be published no earlier than four nor later than ten
days before the election. A facsimile of the official ballot shall must be published in the
calendar week at least once within the two calendar weeks prior to each election. The
notice and ballot shall must be published in the each official newspaper or newspapers of
the municipality as designated in pursuant to § 9-12-6.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.430.35 3 34
If no newspaper is published in the municipality, the notice shall must also be
posted in three of the most public places in the municipality.
Section 6. That § 9-13-21 be AMENDED:
9-13-21. The finance officer shall prepare and furnish, at the expense of the
municipality, all official ballots. The quantity of ballots provided shall must be at least ten
percent more than the number of voters at the last comparable election. The ballots shall
must be as prescribed by the State Board of Elections, of good quality of print paper,
printed in black ink, and in the English language only.
The Except as otherwise provided in this section, the finance officer shall make the
absentee ballots for the municipal elections shall be available for absentee voting election
available no later than fifteen days prior to election day. If the absentee ballots are for a
runoff election, the ballots shall must be available no later than seven days prior to the
runoff election day. If a municipality is located within multiple counties, the finance officer
of the municipality must make absentee ballots available for a uniform period of time
across the entire municipality. If the governing body of the municipality and the board of
county commissioners of at least one county in which the municipality is located have
agreed to combine a municipal election with a primary or general election, pursuant to
§ 9-13-37, and have agreed to use the same ballot for the offices, ballot questions, and
other contests of each jurisdiction, the finance officer must make absentee ballots
available forty-six days before election day across the entire municipality. Absentee voting
shall must be conducted pursuant chapter 12-19.
The names of the candidates for each office to be voted for in the precinct shall
must be arranged without any other designation than that of the office for which they are
candidates. If more than one member of the governing body is to be elected, the ballot
shall must contain instructions as to how many candidates for the governing body are to
be voted for a voter may vote for. The finance officer shall determine, by lot, each
candidate's position on the ballot. Each candidate may be present or represented when
the position on the ballot is being determined.
No candidate's name may be printed upon the official ballot unless the candidate
has been nominated as provided in this chapter.
Section 7. That § 13-7-4.2 be AMENDED:
13-7-4.2. No person An individual may not vote at any a school district election
unless the person individual is registered to vote as a voter of the school district, pursuant
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.430.35 4 34
to chapter 12-4 and resides in, and is a resident of the school district at the time of the
election.
For the purposes of this section, a person resides in an individual is a resident of
the school district if the person actually lives individual:
(1) Lives in the school district for at least thirty days each year, is;
(2) Is a full-time postsecondary education student who resided in was a resident of the
school district immediately prior to leaving for the postsecondary education, or is;
or
(3) Is on active duty as a member of the armed forces whose and the individual's home
of record is within the school district. A voter's qualification as a resident may be
challenged in the manner provided in § 12-18-10.
No election may be contested on the grounds that any a nonresident was allowed
to vote if the nonresident was not challenged in the manner provided in § 12-18-10.
Section 8. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-7:
If the board of a school district and the board of county commissioners of a county
in which the school district is located have agreed to combine the school district election
with a primary or general election, pursuant to § 13-7-10.3, and have agreed to use the
same ballot for the offices, ballot questions, and other contests of each jurisdiction, an
individual's right to vote in the school district election may be challenged only on the
grounds provided in § 12-18-10.
An individual's right to vote in the election may also be challenged as to whether
the individual is a resident of the school district, if the school district election is:
(1) Combined with a primary or general election, but is conducted using separate
ballots for the offices, ballot questions, and other contests of each jurisdiction;
(2) Combined with a municipal election, regardless of whether the election is
conducted using the same ballots for the offices, ballot questions, and other
contests of each jurisdiction; or
(3) Not combined with any other election.
Any challenge to an individual's qualifications as a voter must be conducted before
the precinct election board in the manner provided in § 12-18-10.
Section 9. That § 13-7-5 be AMENDED:
13-7-5. Between the fifteenth day and the thirtieth day of the month six months
before the election, except in the case of the joint election as provided in § 13-7-10.1, the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.430.35 5 34
The business manager of each school district shall publish once each week for two
consecutive weeks in the official newspaper, a notice setting forth the vacancies that will
are to occur by termination of the terms of the elective or appointive school board
members. The notice must be published no earlier than the fifteenth nor later than the
thirtieth day of:
(1) January, for an election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June; or
(2) June, for an election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
If the vacancies set forth in the notice exist within a new school board of a newly
created school district pursuant to § 13-6-62, the county auditor of the county having
jurisdiction over the election must publish the notice once each week for two consecutive
weeks at least one month preceding the election. The notice must also state the time and
place where nominating petitions for school board membership may be filed.
Section 10. That § 13-7-8 be AMENDED:
13-7-8. The business manager of the school district shall publish in the official
newspaper notices of an election once each week for two consecutive weeks with the first
publication not less than ten days. The last notice must be published no earlier than four
nor later than ten days before the election. The notice shall must state the date of the
coming school election,; the vacancies to be filled with terms of each,; the candidates who
have filed for these vacancies,; questions, if any, to be submitted at the election,; and the
location of polling places.
A facsimile of the official ballot shall be published in the calendar week prior to
each election must be published at least once within the two calendar weeks before an
election.
Section 11. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-7:
For purposes of this chapter, "in conjunction with" is a temporal phrase that refers
to the timing of an election.
For purposes of this chapter, "combined with" refers to the sharing of expenses
and governmental responsibilities for an election.
Section 12. That § 13-7-13 be AMENDED:
13-7-13. The business manager of the school district shall provide proper ballots,
pollbooks, voting booths, and necessary supplies as required by law to the proper election
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.430.35 6 34
officials on election day. The ballots shall must be as prescribed by the State Board of
Elections. The quantity number of ballots provided shall must be equal to at least ten
percent more than the number of voters at the last comparable election. No party
affiliation may appear on the ballot and the. The names of the candidates for the respective
vacancies shall must be printed on the ballot.
Each candidate's position on the ballot shall be is to be chosen by lot by the
business manager and each candidate may be present or represented when the position
on the ballot is being determined. The
Except as otherwise provided in this section, the school district business manager
shall make the absentee ballots for the school elections shall be available for absentee
voting district election available no later than fifteen days prior to election day. If a school
district is located in multiple counties, the business manager of the school district must
make absentee ballots available for a uniform period of time across the entire school
district. If the board of the school district and the board of county commissioners of at
least one county in which the school district is located have agreed to combine the school
district election with a primary or general election, pursuant to § 13-7-10.3, and have
agreed to use the same ballot for the offices, ballot questions, and other contests of each
jurisdiction, the business manager must make absentee ballots available forty-six days
before election day across the entire school district.
Section 13. Whereas, sections 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 8, 11, and 12 of this Act are necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, and sections 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 8, 11, and 12 of this Act shall be in full force and
effect from and after its passage and approval.
Section 14. Sections 4, 5, 9, and 10 of this Act are effective beginning December 1, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.